GRAMMARS/PORTUGUESE/FST2/src/lex-loc.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# TYPE:	lexc
!# ENCODING:	UTF-8	[€äàáâ]
!# CONTENT:     location names(other than countries and cities)
!#
!# LANGUAGE:    PORTUGUESE
!#
!# CREATED:	12-Aug-2008
!#
!# ============================================================================
!# sources:
!# OLD/tmp.pol
!# OLD/tmp.geo
!# ADD/lexLocation.xip
!#
!# MARKERS 
!# !! = in both sources
!# !* = from old FSTs
!# ============================================================================
!# NOTE: names from XIP lexicons are  missing gender ("XSG")
!# ============================================================================

Multichar_Symbols

+Noun +Prop +Adj 

+AdminArea
+Desert
+Geo
+Island
+Loc
+Mountain
+Region
+River
+State


+Sg +Pl +SP
+Masc +Fem +MF

+Acron +Abbr


! special markers
(.)	! optional dot
(-)	! optional hyphen
[-]	! hyphen or space

^]	! lemma boundary (for inflecting proper names)



!# ------------------------------------------------------------------------
!# Continuation classes

LEXICON	MSG	+Masc+Sg	#;
LEXICON	FSG	+Fem+Sg		#;
LEXICON	MPL	+Masc+Pl	#;
LEXICON	FPL	+Fem+Pl		#;

LEXICON MSGPL	MSG; MPL;
LEXICON FSGPL	FSG; FPL;

LEXICON MFSGPL	MSGPL; FSGPL;

!# plural = singular
LEXICON MSP	+Masc+SP	#;
LEXICON FSP	+Fem+SP		#;
LEXICON MFSP	MSP; FSP;

!# masc = fem
LEXICON XSG	+MF+Sg		#;
LEXICON XPL	+MF+Pl		#;
LEXICON XSGPL	XSG; XPL;

!# masc = fem; plural = singular
LEXICON XSP	+MF+SP		#;

!# =============================================================================
!# MAIN LEXICON
!# =============================================================================

LEXICON ROOT 
Arkansas+Prop+State		MSG;	!!	cc=US
Dakota% do% Sul+Prop+State	XSG;	!	cc=US
Florida+Prop+State		FSG;	!*	cc=US
Georgia+Prop+State		FSG;	!!	cc=US
Hawaii+Prop+State		MSG;	!!	cc=US
Iowa+Prop+State			MSG;	!!	cc=US
Luisiana+Prop+State		FSG;	!*	cc=US
Maryland+Prop+State		MSG;	!!	cc=US
Mississippi+Prop+State		MSG;	!*	cc=US
Nevada+Prop+State		MSG;	!!	cc=US
New% York+Prop+State		MSG;	!!	cc=US
Oregon+Prop+State		MSG;	!!	cc=US
Pensilvânia+Prop+State		XSG;	!	cc=US
South% Carolina+Prop+State	FSG;	!*	cc=US
Tennessee+Prop+State		MSG;	!!	cc=US
Washington+Prop+State		MSG;	!!	cc=US
West% Virginia+Prop+State	FSG;	!*	cc=US
Acre+Prop+State					MSG;	!*	cc=BR
Amapá+Prop+State				MSG;	!!	cc=BR
Bahia+Prop+State				FSG;	!!	cc=BR
Ceará+Prop+State				MSG;	!!	cc=BR
Espírito% Santo+Prop+State			MSG;	!!	cc=BR
Maranhão+Prop+State				MSG;	!!	cc=BR
Mato% Grosso+Prop+State				MSG;	!!	cc=BR
Minas% Gerais+Prop+State+Acron:MG		FPL;	!*	cc=BR
Minas% Gerais+Prop+State			FPL;	!!	cc=BR
Paraná+Prop+State				MSG;	!!	cc=BR
Pernambuco+Prop+State				MSG;	!!	cc=BR
Rio% de% Janeiro+Prop+State			MSG;	!!	cc=BR
Rio% Grande% do% Sul+Prop+State			MSG;	!!	cc=BR
Rondônia+Prop+State				FSG;	!!	cc=BR
Santa% Catarina+Prop+State			FSG;	!!	cc=BR
São% Paulo+Prop+State+Acron:SP			MSG;	!*	cc=BR
Tocantins+Prop+State+Acron:TO			MSG;	!*	cc=BR
México% DF+Prop+State			MSG;
Açores+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea				MPL;	!	cc=PT
Alentejo+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea+Acron:ALT		MSG;	!*	cc=PT
Alto% Alentejo+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea+Acron:AT% ALT	MSG;	!*	cc=PT
Baixo% Alentejo+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea+Acron:BX% ALT	MSG;	!*	cc=PT
Beira% Alta+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			FSG;	!	cc=PT
Beira% Baixa+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			FSG;	!	cc=PT
Beira% Litoral+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			FSG;	!*	cc=PT
Beira+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea				FSG;	!	cc=PT
Beiras+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea				FPL;	!	cc=PT
Douro+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea+Acron:DOU			MSG;	!*	cc=PT
Estremadura+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			FSG;	!!	cc=PT
Ribatejo+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea+Acron:RIB		MSG;	!*	cc=PT
Trás-os-Montes+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea:Trás-Os-Montes	MSG;	!	cc=PT
PALOP+Prop+Loc+AdminArea				MPL;
palops+Prop+Loc+AdminArea				MPL;
Abrécia+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			XSG;
Adrumeto+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			XSG;
Alpes+Prop+Loc+AdminArea				MPL;	!!
Ambaca+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			XSG;
América% do% Norte+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea	FSG;	!!
Anatólia+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			FSG;	!!
Andes+Prop+Loc+AdminArea				MPL;	!!
Apúlia+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			FSG;	!!
Ardenas+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			FPL;	!*
Armórica+Prop+Loc+AdminArea				FSG;	!*
Assam+Prop+Loc+AdminArea				XSG;
Assíria+Prop+Loc+AdminArea				FSG;	!*
Astúrias+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			FPL;	!!
Baleares+Prop+Loc+AdminArea				FPL;	!!
Baltistão+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			XSG;
Baviera+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			FSG;	!!	cc=DE
Beócia+Prop+Loc+AdminArea				FSG;	!*
Bessarábia+Prop+Loc+AdminArea			FSG;	!*
Biafra+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			XSG;
Boémia+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			FSG;	!!
Bravante+Prop+Loc+AdminArea				MSG;	!*
Bretanha+Prop+Loc+AdminArea				FSG;	!*
Bucovina+Prop+Loc+AdminArea				FSG;	!*
Campânia+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			FSG;	!!
Canárias+Prop+Loc+AdminArea				FPL;	!!
Cantábria+Prop+Loc+AdminArea			XSG;
Carrara+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			FSG;	!!
Catalunha+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			FSG;	!!
Champanha+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			FSG;	!*	cc=FR
Cevenas+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			FPL;	!*	cc=FR
Circássia+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			XSG;
Cornualha+Prop+Loc+AdminArea			FSG;	!!
Domínica+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			XSG;
Escócia+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			XSG;
Estíria+Prop+Loc+AdminArea				FSG;	!*
Flandres+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			FSG;	!!
Franco-Condado+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea		MSG;	!!
Gália+Prop+Loc+AdminArea				FSG;	!*
Gasconha+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			FSG;	!!
Guiena+Prop+Loc+AdminArea				FSG;	!*
Haco+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			XSG;
Ilha-de-França+Prop+Loc+AdminArea			FSG;	!*
Insulíndia+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea		FSG;	!!
Judéia+Prop+Loc+AdminArea				FSG;	!*
Lácio+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			XSG;
Ligúria+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			FSG;	!!
Limburgo+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			XSG;
Linguadoque+Prop+Loc+AdminArea			MSG;	!*
Malabar+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			MSG;	!!
Manitoba+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			XSG;
Mediterrâneo+Prop+Loc+AdminArea			MSG;	!!
Melanésia+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			FSG;	!!
Minas+Prop+Loc+AdminArea				FPL;	!*
Montenegro+Prop+Loc+AdminArea			XSG;
Novas% Hébridas+Prop+Loc+AdminArea			FPL;	!*
Núbia+Prop+Loc+AdminArea				XSG;
Pacaraima+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			XSG;
Palestina+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			FSG;	!*
Patagônia+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			FSG;	!!
Périgord+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			XSG;
Provença+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			FSG;	!!
Queensland+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea		XSG;
Rife+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			XSG;
Rutênia+Prop+Loc+AdminArea				FSG;	!*
Sâmnio+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			XSG;
Sérvia+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			FSG;	!!
Siquim+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			XSG;
Suméria+Prop+Loc+AdminArea				FSG;	!*
Taiti+Prop+Loc+AdminArea				MSG;	!*
Tasmania+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			XSG;
Toscânia+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			XSG;
Transcaucásia+Prop+Loc+AdminArea			FSG;	!*
Turquestão+Prop+Loc+AdminArea			MSG;	!*
Umbria+Prop+Loc+AdminArea				FSG;	!*
Urais+Prop+Loc+AdminArea				XSG;
Venécia+Prop+Loc+AdminArea				FSG;	!*
Wight+Prop+Loc+Region+AdminArea			XSG;
Zululândia+Prop+Loc+AdminArea			FSG;	!*
Andes+Prop+Mountain				XSG;
Cáucaso+Prop+Mountain				XSG;
Jura+Prop+Mountain				XSG;
Pirinéus+Prop+Mountain				MPL;
Pirenéus+Prop+Geo				MPL;	!*
Tupungato+Prop+Mountain				MSG;	! Chile
Andamão+Prop+Loc+AdminArea+Island			XSG;
Astipaleia+Prop+Loc+AdminArea+Island			XSG;
Caribe+Prop+Loc+AdminArea+Island			XSG;
Creta+Prop+Loc+AdminArea+Island				XSG;
Guadalupe+Prop+Loc+AdminArea+Island			XSG;
Ilhas% Norfolk+Prop+Loc+AdminArea+Island		XSG;
Lesbos+Prop+Loc+AdminArea+Island			XSG;
Man+Prop+Loc+AdminArea+Island				XSG;
Pico+Prop+Loc+AdminArea+Island				XSG;
Samoa% Americana+Prop+Loc+AdminArea+Island		XSG;
Santa% Cruz% das% Flores+Prop+Loc+AdminArea+Island	XSG;
São% Vicente+Prop+Loc+AdminArea+Island			XSG;
Seycheles+Prop+Loc+AdminArea+Island			XSG;
Terra% Nova+Prop+Loc+AdminArea+Island			XSG;
Kara% Kum+Prop+Loc+Geo+Desert			XSG;
Calaári+Prop+Loc+Geo+Desert			XSG;
Kalahari+Prop+Loc+Geo+Desert			XSG;
Ordos+Prop+Loc+Geo+Desert			XSG;
Taklamakan+Prop+Loc+Geo+Desert 		XSG;
Tejo+Prop+Loc+River			MSG;
Amu% Dária+Prop+Loc+River		MSG;
Baía% de% Bengala+Prop+Loc+Geo		FSG;
Canal% de% Moçambique+Prop+Loc+Geo	MSG;
Golfo% do% México+Prop+Loc+Geo		MSG;
Mar% Celta+Prop+Loc+Geo			MSG;
Mar% da% Tasmânia+Prop+Loc+Geo		MSG;
Mar% de% Arafura+Prop+Loc+Geo		MSG;
Mar% de% Bohai+Prop+Loc+Geo		MSG;
Mar% de% Kara+Prop+Loc+Geo		MSG;
Mar% de% Ross+Prop+Loc+Geo		MSG;
Mar% do% Arquipélago+Prop+Loc+Geo	MSG;
Mar% Interior+Prop+Loc+Geo		MSG;
Mar% Tirreno+Prop+Loc+Geo		MSG;
Sete% Mares+Prop+Loc+Geo		MPL;
Estreito% de% Bass+Prop+Loc+Geo			XSG;
Dardanelos+Prop+Loc+Geo				XSG;
Estreito% de% Kerch+Prop+Loc+Geo		XSG;
Uresund+Prop+Loc+Geo				XSG;
Cais% do% Sodré+Prop+Loc+AdminArea				XSG;
Praça% da% Figueira+Prop+Loc+Geo			XSG;
Praça% de% Mouzinho% de% Albuquerque+Prop+Loc+Geo	XSG;
Praça% do% Município+Prop+Loc+Geo			XSG;
Praça% de% Toiros% Vista% Alegre% Bilbao+Prop+Loc+Geo	XSG;
Aleutes+Prop+Geo		FPL;	!*
Antilhas+Prop+Geo		FPL;	!*
Ararate+Prop+Geo		MSG;	!*
Balcãs+Prop+Geo			MPL;	!*
Boa% Vista+Prop+Geo		FSG;	!*
Caldéia+Prop+Geo		FSG;	!*
Celebes+Prop+Geo		FPL;	!*
Chiado+Prop+Geo			MSG;	!*
Cirenaica+Prop+Geo		FSG;	!*
Curilhas+Prop+Geo		FPL;	!*
Cíclades+Prop+Geo		FPL;	!*
Eufrates+Prop+Geo		MSG;	!*
Floresta% Negra+Prop+Geo	FSG;	!*
Gólgota+Prop+Geo		MSG;	!*
Laquedivas+Prop+Geo		FPL;	!*
Lemano+Prop+Geo			MSG;	!*
Madagáscar+Prop+Geo		FSG;	!*
Nova% Zembla+Prop+Geo		FSG;	!*
Pacoti+Prop+Geo			MSG;	!*
Peninos+Prop+Geo		MPL;	!*
Santo% Antão+Prop+Geo		MSG;	!*
Senegâmbia+Prop+Geo		FSG;	!*
Terra% do% Fogo+Prop+Geo	FSG;	!*
Tiberíade+Prop+Geo		MSG;	!*
Vosgos+Prop+Geo			MPL;	!*
Wake+Prop+Geo			FSG;	!*
Ártico+Prop+Geo			MSG;	!*
Índias+Prop+Geo			FPL;	!*
